Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1101.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1426. Menstrual Hygiene Products Accessibility Grant Program.--(a) The Menstrual Hygiene Products Accessibility Grant Program is established in the department.(b) The department shall implement and administer the program. The department, in consultation with the Department of Health, shall develop a grant application form for eligible 123456789101112131415161718 public school entities that seek a grant under the program. At a minimum, the form shall contain the following information:(1) The number of students enrolled at the eligible public school entity . (2) The number of restrooms accessible to students on the property of the eligible public school entity.(c) A public school entity shall be eligible to receive a grant under the program if the public school entity has twenty- five percent (25%) or more students enrolled in free or reduced- cost lunch under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 13 (relating to school lunch programs).(d) After review of the information provided in each eligible public school entity's submitted application, the department shall award money from the program to the eligible public school entity and, if so, the amount of the program money awarded to each eligible entity. Grants shall be awarded in an amount that is proportionate to the number of students and restrooms specified in the eligible public school entity's application . (e) A grant recipient shall:(1) Use the grant award to acquire and distribute menstrual hygiene products at no expense to students, including installing and maintaining a dispensing machine or disposal receptacle for menstrual hygiene products.(2) E nsure that menstrual hygiene products are accessible to students . (f) The following shall apply:(1) Within one year of being awarded a grant, each grant recipient shall report to the department the amount of money spent on the acquisition and distribution of menstrual hygiene 20250HB1101PN1177 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 products and the amount of money spent on the installation and maintenance of a dispensing machine or disposal receptacle for menstrual hygiene products.(2) By March 31 of each year, the department shall submit a summarized report from new information received under paragraph (1) since the previous report to the Education Committee of the Senate, the Education Committee of the House of Representatives, the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(g) The department, in consultation with the Department of Health, may issue guidance necessary to implement the program.(h) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department" means the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Menstrual hygiene products" means tampons, sanitary napkins or pads, pantyliners and similar menstrual hygiene products."Program" means the Menstrual Hygiene Products Accessibility Grant Program established under subsection (a)."Public school entity" means a school district, charter school, regional charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school operating within this Commonwealth.Section 2. The General Assembly shall appropriate money from the General Fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal year July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026, for the purposes of funding the Menstrual Hygiene Products Accessibility Grant Program.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1101PN1177 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728